Wyoming, session 2026, SF0058.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 14-6-715(b) is repealed.
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
1